Utah statutes.
10-1-304.   Municipality and military installation development authority may
levy tax -- Rate -- Imposition or repeal of tax -- Tax rate change --
Effective date -- Notice requirements -- Exemptions.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (4) and (5), a municipality may
levy a municipal energy sales and use tax on the sale or use of taxable energy
within the municipality:
(i)  by ordinance as provided in Section 10-1-305; and
(ii)  of up to 6% of the delivered value of the taxable energy.
(b)  Subject to Section 63H-1-203, the military installation development
authority created in Section 63H-1-201 may levy a municipal energy sales and
use tax under this part within a project area described in a project area plan
adopted by the authority under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation
Development Authority Act, as though the authority were a municipality.
(2)  A municipal energy sales and use tax imposed under this part may be in
addition to any sales and use tax imposed by the municipality under Title 59,
Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.
(3) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (3):
(i)  "Annexation" means an annexation to a municipality under Title 10,
Chapter 2, Part 4, Annexation.
(ii)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a municipality.
(b) (i)  If, on or after May 1, 2000, a city or town enacts or repeals a tax
or changes the rate of a tax under this part, the enactment, repeal, or change
shall take effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (3)(b)(ii) from the
municipality.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (3)(b)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the city or town will enact or repeal a tax or change the rate of a
tax under this part;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(3)(b)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (3)(b)(ii)(A); and
(D)  if the city or town enacts the tax or changes the rate of the tax
described in Subsection (3)(b)(ii)(A), the new rate of the tax.
(c) (i)  If, for an annexation that occurs on or after May 1, 2000, the
annexation will result in a change in the rate of a tax under this part for an
annexing area, the change shall take effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (3)(c)(ii) from the municipality
that annexes the annexing area.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (3)(c)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the annexation described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) will result in a
change in the rate of a tax under this part for the annexing area;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(3)(c)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (3)(c)(ii)(A); and
(D)  the new rate of the tax described in Subsection (3)(c)(ii)(A).
(4)  A sale or use of electricity within a municipality is exempt from the tax
authorized by this section if the sale or use is:
(a)  made under a tariff adopted by the Public Service Commission of Utah only
for purchase of electricity produced from a new wind, geothermal, biomass, or
solar power energy source, as designated in the tariff by the Public Service
Commission of Utah; and
(b)  for an amount of electricity that is:
(i)  unrelated to the amount of electricity used by the person purchasing the
electricity under the tariff described in Subsection (4)(a); and
(ii)  equivalent to the number of kilowatthours specified in the tariff
described in Subsection (4)(a) that may be purchased under the tariff
described in Subsection (4)(a).
(5) (a)  A municipality may not levy a municipal energy sales and use tax
within any portion of the municipality that is within a project area described
in a project area plan adopted by the military installation development
authority under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development
Authority Act.
(b)  Subsection (5)(a) does not apply to the military installation development
authority's levy of a municipal energy sales and use tax.
